Massachusetts, session 194th, S2186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39G of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the eighth paragraph the following paragraph:-
Every contract subject to section 44A of chapter 149 or subject to section 39M of chapter
30 or subject to chapter 149A, and every subcontract or trade contract as applicable, shall
provide a reasonable time period within which a written request submitted by a person seeking
an increase in the contract price shall be approved or rejected, whether in whole or in part. The
time period shall not exceed 30 days after the later of commencement of the performance of the
work on which the request is based or submission of the written request; provided, however, that
the time period, as applicable to approval or rejection by the person at each tier of contract below
of 2

the owner of the project, may be extended by 7 days more than the time period applicable to the
person at the tier of contract above the person. A request which is neither approved nor rejected
within such time period shall be deemed to be approved and may be submitted for payment
within the next application for a periodic progress payment, unless it is rejected before the date
payment if due. A rejection of a request, whether in whole or in part, shall be made in writing,
shall include an explanation of the factual and contractual basis for the rejection and shall be
certified as made in good faith. A rejection of a request shall be subject to the applicable dispute
resolution procedure. A provision in the contract which requires a party to delay commencement
of the procedure until a date later than 60 days after the rejection shall be void and
unenforceable.
of 2